Massachusetts, session 194th, H3645.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The portion of state highway route 7A in the town of Lenox from mile marker 2 to mile
marker 2.62 shall be designated and known as the Ross B. Dindio Memorial highway. The
Massachusetts Department of Transportation is hereby directed to erect and maintain suitable
markers along said highway bearing said designation in accordance with the standards of the
department.
of 1